Washington statutes.
RCW 43.24.086

Fee policy for professions, occupations, and businesses—Determination by rule.

It shall be the policy of the state of Washington that the cost of each professional, occupational[,] or business licensing program be fully borne by the members of that profession, occupation[,] or business. The director of licensing shall from time to time establish the amount of all application fees, license fees, registration fees, examination fees, permit fees, renewal fees, and any other fee associated with licensing or regulation of professions, occupations[,] or businesses, except for health professions, administered by the department of licensing. In fixing said fees, the director shall set the fees for each such program at a sufficient level to defray the costs of administering that program. All such fees shall be fixed by rule adopted by the director in accordance with the provisions of the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 1999 c 240 s 2; 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 315; 1987 c 467 s 7; 1983 c 168 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1989 1st ex.s. c 9: See RCW 43.70.910 and 43.70.920.

Regulation of health professions: Chapters 18.120 and 18.122 RCW.